Hawaii statutes.
§480-13 Suits by persons injured; amount of
recovery, injunctions. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c),
any person who is injured in the person's business or property by reason of
anything forbidden or declared unlawful by this chapter:

(1) May sue for damages sustained by the person, and,
if the judgment is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be awarded a sum not
less than $1,000 or threefold damages by the plaintiff sustained, whichever sum
is the greater, and reasonable attorney's fees together with the costs of suit;
provided that indirect purchasers injured by an illegal overcharge shall
recover only compensatory damages, and reasonable attorney's fees together with
the costs of suit in actions not brought under section 480-14(c); and

(2) May bring proceedings to enjoin the unlawful
practices, and if the decree is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be
awarded reasonable attorney's fees together with the costs of suit.

(b) Any consumer who is injured by any unfair
or deceptive act or practice forbidden or declared unlawful by section 480-2:

(1) May sue for damages sustained by the consumer,
and, if the judgment is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be awarded a sum
not less than $1,000 or threefold damages by the plaintiff sustained, whichever
sum is the greater, and reasonable attorney's fees together with the costs of
suit; provided that where the plaintiff is an elder, the plaintiff, in the
alternative, may be awarded a sum not less than $5,000 or threefold any damages
sustained by the plaintiff, whichever sum is the greater, and reasonable
attorney's fees together with the costs of suit. In determining whether to
adopt the $5,000 alternative amount in an award to an elder, the court shall
consider the factors set forth in section 480-13.5; and

(2) May bring proceedings to enjoin the unlawful
practices, and if the decree is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be
awarded reasonable attorney's fees together with the costs of suit.

(c) The remedies provided in subsections (a)
and (b) shall be applied in class action and de facto class action lawsuits or
proceedings, including actions brought on behalf of direct or indirect
purchasers; provided that:

(1) The minimum $1,000 recovery provided in
subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply in a class action or a de facto class
action lawsuit;

(2) In class actions or de facto class actions where
both direct and indirect purchasers are involved, or where more than one class
of indirect purchasers are involved, a defendant shall be entitled to prove as
a partial or complete defense to a claim for compensatory damages that the
illegal overcharge has been passed on or passed back to others who are
themselves entitled to recover so as to avoid the duplication of recovery of
compensatory damages;

(3) That portion of threefold damages in excess of
compensatory damages shall be apportioned and allocated by the court in its
exercise of discretion so as to promote effective enforcement of this chapter
and deterrence from violation of its provisions;

(4) In no event shall an indirect purchaser be
awarded less than the full measure of compensatory damages attributable to the
indirect purchaser;

(5) In any lawsuit or lawsuits in which claims are
asserted by both direct purchasers and indirect purchasers, the court is
authorized to exercise its discretion in the apportionment of damages, and in
the transfer and consolidation of cases to avoid the duplication of the
recovery of damages and the multiplicity of suits, and in other respects to obtain
substantial fairness;

(6) In any case in which claims are being asserted by
a part of the claimants in a court of this State and another part of the
claimants in a court other than of this State, where the claims arise out of
same or overlapping transactions, the court is authorized to take all steps
reasonable and necessary to avoid duplication of recovery of damages and
multiplicity of suits, and in other respects, to obtain substantial fairness;

(7) In instances where indirect purchasers file an action
and obtain a judgment or settlement prior to the completion of a direct
purchaser's action in courts other than this State, the court shall delay
disbursement of the damages until such time as the direct purchaser's suits are
resolved to either final judgment, consent decree or settlement, or in the
absence of a direct purchaser's lawsuit in the courts other than this State by
direct purchasers, the expiration of the statute of limitations, or in such
manner that will minimize duplication of damages to the extent reasonable and
practicable, avoid multiplicity of suit, and obtain substantial fairness; and

(8) In the event damages in a class action or de
facto class action remain unclaimed by the direct or indirect purchasers, the
class representative or the attorney general shall apply to the court and such
funds shall escheat to the State upon showing that reasonable efforts made by
the State to distribute the funds have been unsuccessful.

(d) The remedies provided in this section are
cumulative and may be brought in one action. [L 1961, c 190, §11; Supp,
§205A-11; HRS §480-13; am L 1969, c 108, §1; am L 1974, c 33, §1; am L 1980, c
69, §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 274, §4; am L 1998, c 179, §2; am L 2001, c
79, §1; am L 2002, c 229, §3; am L 2005, c 108, §3]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Law Journals and Reviews

Updating Unfair or Deceptive Acts and Practices Under Chapter
480-2. 10 HBJ No. 13, at pg. 109.

What Can the Abolition of Slavery Teach Us About Climate
Change? Local Action in the Liquefied Natural Gas Controversy. 35 UH L. Rev.
687 (2013).

Case Notes

Divestiture is not available remedy in private action. 518
F.2d 913.

Requires showing that suit in public interest; may be proven
by knowledge of illegality. 732 F.2d 1403.

In action by physician relating to termination of hospital
staff privileges, public interest favors hospital. 754 F.2d 1420.

Public interest requirement not met by employer's negligent
misrepresentation that it guaranteed employees full payment of their pensions.
804 F.2d 1418.

Section creates private right of action for violations of
§480-2. 809 F.2d 626.

Appellant debtor's claim under this section remanded
to the bankruptcy court to make the proper requisite findings of fact under
this section where the bankruptcy court's findings of fact appear to establish
that debtor's losses "result[ed] from" debtor's default, rather than
from appellee lenders' failure to shout out the postponement of the foreclosure
sale of debtor's property. 674 F.3d 1083 (2012).

A borrower need only allege that a lender has breached its
statutory duty not to engage in "unfair or deceptive acts or practices in
the conduct of any trade or commerce" in a way that caused private damages
in order to state a claim under this section and §480-2. 761 F.3d 1046 (2014).

District courts evaluating whether a borrower's complaint
states a claim under this section and §480-2 against a lender need only address
whether the complaint adequately alleges that the lender used unfair or
deceptive acts in its relationship with the borrower, without looking to
negligence law to determine whether the lender breached a common law duty of
care. 761 F.3d 1046 (2014).

Availability of laches, estoppel, and unclean hands as defenses
in private antitrust action discussed. 296 F. Supp. 920.

Past or impending anticompetitive behavior justifying
injunctive relief was not shown. 491 F. Supp. 1199.

Section 480-13 creates private right of action for violations
of §480-2. 491 F. Supp. 1199.

Real estate transaction not a sale of goods or services,
therefore defendants were not "merchants" within meaning of statute;
there is insufficient public interest to bring a suit under this section where
there is merely a sale of a hotel from one private party to another. 680 F.
Supp. 1438.

Although a damage claim under this section based on
violations of §480-2 may only be asserted against the wrongdoer, a rescission
claim under chapter 480 can stand against subsequent assignees if the contract
is void; where plaintiff had alleged that defendant mortgage broker assigned or
sold loans to other defendants, plaintiff could seek rescission against other
defendants if mortgage broker violated chapter 480 and the loans were void;
however, a plaintiff seeking affirmatively to void a mortgage transaction under
§480-12 must "place the parties in as close a position as they held prior
to the transaction". 861 F. Supp. 2d 1153 (2012).

Because the language contained in §480-2 is similar to California's
statute, and since plaintiff appears to base plaintiff's claim on
"fraudulent concealment", plaintiff was required to plead plaintiff's
unfair and deceptive trade practices claim with specificity; defendants' motion
to dismiss based on this issue granted. 730 F. Supp. 2d 1213 (2010).

Plaintiffs' unfair or deceptive acts or practices claims
dismissed; this section and §480-2 do not provide a cause of action for
personal injury claims. 100 F. Supp. 2d 1265 (2010).

Plaintiff not entitled to summary judgment on plaintiff's
claim under this section, as plaintiff failed to establish that plaintiff was
actually damaged by defendant's failure to register as a debt collector. 183
F. Supp. 2d 1234.

A municipality may be held liable under this chapter if its
act is done "in the conduct of any trade or commerce", but is not
subject to a treble damage penalty. 215 F. Supp. 2d 1098.

Requisites of allegations for standing purposes. 61 H. 607,
607 P.2d 1304.

Policy is to foster private actions even where acts do not
culminate in injury to competition. 63 H. 289, 627 P.2d 260.

As between common law fraud claim and chapter 480 claim,
where election of remedies was not unequivocal and knowledgeable, plaintiff not
estopped from recovering under statutory claim. 80 H. 54, 905 P.2d 29.

Real estate or residences did not qualify as
"goods" under §480-1, but did qualify as "personal
investments"; homebuyer thus had standing as "consumer" to bring
claim under this section. 80 H. 54, 905 P.2d 29.

Under subsection (b)(1), award of attorneys' fees are
mandatory and comprise portion of the statutory recovery for purposes of
calculating the "greater amount" of recovery. 80 H. 54, 905 P.2d 29.

Where employee was not a "consumer" as defined
under §480-1, employee lacked standing to maintain private cause of action
under this section against workers' compensation insurer based on alleged
violation of §480-2. 83 H. 457, 927 P.2d 858.

Where employer was not a "consumer" as defined
under §480-1, employee could not maintain action under this section, based on
employee's third party beneficiary status, against workers' compensation
insurer for alleged violation of §480-2. 83 H. 457, 927 P.2d 858.

There is no private claim for relief under this section for
unfair methods of competition in violation of §480-2; private remedy is
restricted to claims of unfair or deceptive acts or practices. 91 H. 224, 982
P.2d 853.

Where appellants failed to adduce evidence of a causal
connection between appellees' "anticompetitive" conduct and
appellees' alleged monopoly power, trial court properly concluded that there
was insufficient evidence to sustain appellants' attempt to monopolize claim
under §480-9; thus, as appellants failed to prove a violation of chapter 480,
appellants had no standing to bring claim for relief under subsection (a). 91
H. 224, 982 P.2d 853.

As subsection (b) enumerates the specific damages that a
consumer may recover under this chapter and makes no provision for punitive
damages, plaintiffs were precluded from seeking punitive damages under this
chapter. 98 H. 309, 47 P.3d 1222.

By the plain language of this chapter, no actual purchase is
necessary as a prerequisite to a consumer recovering damages under this
section, based on injuries stemming from violations of §480-2. 98 H. 309, 47
P.3d 1222.

Where plaintiff alleged that, as a result of defendant's
unfair or deceptive practices, plaintiff was required to divert substantial
resources and time to deal with its members' problems created by defendant's
conduct--"resources that otherwise would go to support its principal
mission in service of its members", plaintiff sufficiently alleged the
"injury to business or property" element essential to recovery under
this section. 113 H. 77, 148 P.3d 1179.

Although plaintiffs were "consumers" within the
meaning of §480-1 and this section, plaintiffs' payment of their Hawaii medical
services association (HMSA) lien to the Kentucky-based company that contracted
with HMSA to provide subrogation and "claims recovery services", but
which had violated §443B-3 (collection agency registration requirements), did
not constitute an injury for which plaintiffs could bring suit under subsection
(b). 117 H. 153, 177 P.3d 341.

Employees are "any persons" within the meaning of
§§480-1 and 480-2(e) and are within the category of plaintiffs who have
standing to bring a claim under §480-2(e) for a violation of §481B-14; however,
based on the allegations contained in employees' amended complaint, employees
did not sufficiently allege the "nature of the competition" to bring
a claim for damages against employer under §§480-2(e) and subsection (a) for a
violation of §481B-14. 122 H. 423, 228 P.3d 303 (2010).

Liability under section not limited to injuries to business;
does not extend to personal injury actions. 1 H. App. 111, 615 P.2d 749.

Damages for mental distress and suffering are not
recoverable. 2 H. App. 301, 632 P.2d 1071.

Lender of domestic currency is not a "merchant". 2
H. App. 301, 632 P.2d 1071.

Essential elements for cause of action under this section. 2
H. App. 435, 634 P.2d 111.

Legislature was aware that damages might be de minimus in a
consumer action and specifically provided for the $1,000 award or triple
damages to cover that possibility. 2 H. App. 435, 634 P.2d 111.

Does not supersede remedy for common law fraud; corporation's
president was "merchant". 6 H. App. 125, 712 P.2d 1148.

Plaintiff suing store's commercial general liability insurer
for injuries received in slip and fall was not "consumer" as defined
in §480-1, and therefore lacked standing to maintain private cause of action
under this section. 82 H. 363 (App.), 922 P.2d 976.

When litigant is entitled to treble damages under this
section, trial court shall not award three times compensatory damages plus
compensatory damages; proper measurement of treble damages is simply three
times compensatory damages. 84 H. 162 (App.), 931 P.2d 604.

In action by consumer under §480-2, "unclean hands"
of consumer not a defense to claim for damages under subsection (b)(1). 86 H.
405 (App.), 949 P.2d 1026.

Though section does not provide for setoff in unfair and
deceptive trade practice cases, under certain circumstances, such setoff
allowable; court properly awarded defendant car dealer car's ten-day rental
value and cost of repairs for damage to car inflicted by plaintiff. 86 H. 405
(App.), 949 P.2d 1026.

Trebling of damages under subsection (b)(1) should be
calculated before setoff award to defendant is applied. 86 H. 405 (App.), 949
P.2d 1026.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next